Florida, session 2026, HB385.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 409.14512, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
409.14512 People's Relief Program.—
(1) The People's Relief Program is created within the
department. The purpose of the program is to provide residents
of this state who are experiencing economic hardship with
assistance for everyday expenses, such as housing, childcare,
and health care.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that this program
ensure long-term financial stability for individuals and
families who reside in this state by offering grants to assist
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb385-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 385 2026
residents experiencing economic hardship.
(3) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the
program shall provide assistance in the form of grants to
residents experiencing economic hardship. Such grants must be
available to residents if any of the following occurs:
(a) Utility costs rise above a specified percentage of
average household income.
(b) Property insurance premiums rise above a specified
threshold.
(c) Statewide unemployment rises above a specified
percentage.
(d) An economic decline causes widespread hardship.
(e) A natural disaster leads to the declaration of a state
of emergency.
(4) To be eligible for assistance under the program, an
individual must:
(a) Have been a resident of this state for at least 1 year
before applying;
(b) Provide evidence of a change in circumstances which
hinders or prohibits the individual from being able to fulfill
pending financial obligations related to utility, property
insurance, childcare, or health care expenses; and
(c) Provide documentation of utility costs, property
insurance premiums, childcare expenses, or health care expenses.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement this
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb385-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 385 2026
section. The rules must, at a minimum, include all of the
following:
(a) An application that must be available on the
department's website.
(b) The specified thresholds for the conditions in
paragraphs (3)(a)-(d).
(c) The procedures for awarding and disbursing the grants.
(d) Restrictions on the use of grant funds.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb385-00